District of Columbia statutes.
1-602.01

Coverage; exceptions.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, unless specifically exempted from certain provisions, this chapter shall apply to all employees of the District of Columbia government, except the Chief Judges and Associate Judges of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia and the District of Columbia Court of Appeals and the nonjudicial personnel of said Courts. With the exception of subchapters V and XVII of this chapter, and § 1-608.01(e), employees of the D.C. General Hospital and the D.C. General Hospital Commission shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

The provisions of subchapter XV-A shall apply to employees of all District agencies, including, but not limited to employees of subordinate agencies, independent agencies, the District of Columbia Board of Education, the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia, the District of Columbia Housing Authority, and the Metropolitan Police Department.

(d)

With the exception of subchapters V, XXVII, XV-A, XXI, XXII, XXIII and XXVI, employees of the District of Columbia Housing Authority shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 201, 25 DCR 5740
Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(a), 34 DCR 5079
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-228, § 2(a), 36 DCR 754
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 760, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11261(b)(1)
Oct. 7, 1998, D.C. Law 12-160, § 102(a)(1), 45 DCR 5147
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-105, § 27, 47 DCR 1325
June 12, 2003, D.C. Law 14-310, § 4(a), 50 DCR 1092

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-602.1.
1973 Ed., § 1-332.1.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-105 added subsec. (d).
D.C. Law 14-310, in subsec. (c), validated a previously made technical correction.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 102(a)(1) of the Whistleblower Reinforcement Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-400, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 5158) and § 102(a)(1) of the Whistleblower Reinforcement Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-464, October 28, 1998, 45 DCR 7821).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 26 of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-259, February 9, 2000, 47 DCR 1129).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 26 of the District of Columbia Housing Authority Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-346, June 5, 2000, 47 DCR 4980).

Editor's Notes

Washington Convention Center: Section 9-817 of the D.C. Code provided that the District of Columbia Government Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act of 1978 shall not apply to employees of the Washington Convention Center.